Utah statutes.
63J-1-314.   Deposits related to the Disaster Recovery Funding Act.
(1)  As used in this section, "operating deficit" means that, at the end of
the fiscal year, the unreserved and undesignated fund balance in the General
Fund is less than zero.
(2) Except as provided under Subsection (3), beginning with the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2007, at the end of each fiscal year and after the transfer of
surplus General Fund revenues has been made to the General Fund Budget Reserve
Account as provided in Section 63J-1-312, the Division of Finance shall
deposit an amount into the State Disaster Recovery Restricted Account, created
in Section 53-2-403, calculated by:
(a)  determining the amount of surplus General Fund revenues after the
transfer to the General Fund Budget Reserve Account under Section 63J-1-312
that is unrestricted and undesignated;
(b)  calculating an amount equal to the lesser of:
(i)  25% of the amount determined under Subsection (2)(a); or
(ii)  6% of the total of the General Fund appropriation amount for the fiscal
year in which the surplus occurs; and
(c)  adding to the amount calculated under Subsection (2)(b) an amount equal
to the lesser of:
(i)  25% more of the amount described in Subsection (2)(a); or
(ii)  the amount necessary to replace, in accordance with this Subsection
(2)(c), any amount appropriated from the State Disaster Recovery Restricted
Account within 10 fiscal years before the fiscal year in which the surplus
occurs if:
(A)  a surplus exists; and
(B)  the Legislature appropriates money from the State Disaster Recovery
Restricted Account that is not replaced by appropriation or as provided in
this Subsection (2)(c).
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2):
(a)  if, at the end of a fiscal year, the Division of Finance determines that
an operating deficit exists, the Division of Finance shall reduce the transfer
to the State Disaster Recovery Restricted Account by the amount necessary to
eliminate the operating deficit; and
(b)  for FY 2008-09 and FY 2009-10 only, the Division of Finance shall suspend
the deposit provided under Subsection (2) to the State Disaster Recovery
Restricted Account created under Section 53-2-403.
